test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-huksim_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - huksim: # C stems Morottaja ja Olthuis
    huksim+N+Sg+Nom: huksim
    huksim+N+Sg+Gen: huksim
    huksim+N+Sg+Acc: huksim
    huksim+N+Sg+Ill: huksiimân
    huksim+N+Sg+Loc: huksiimist
    huksim+N+Sg+Com: huksiimáin
    huksim+N+Sg+Abe: huksimttáá
    huksim+N+Ess: huksiimin
    huksim+N+Par: huksiimid
    huksim+N+Pl+Nom: huksiimeh
    huksim+N+Pl+Gen: [huksimij, huksiimij]
    huksim+N+Pl+Acc: [huksimijd, huksiimijd]
    huksim+N+Pl+Ill: [huksimáid, huksiimáid]
    huksim+N+Pl+Loc: [huksimijn, huksiimijn]
    huksim+N+Pl+Com: [huksimijguin, huksiimijn]
    huksim+N+Pl+Abe: [huksimijttáá, huksiimijn]
    
